California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(8) Individuals with disabilities and their advocates are full partners in the vocational rehabilitation and independent living programs and shall be involved on a regular basis and in a meaningful manner with respect to policy development and implementation.

(9) Qualified vocational rehabilitation counselors, and other qualified personnel facilitate the
 accomplishment of the employment and independent living goals and objectives of an individual.

(10) Accountability measures must facilitate and not impede the accomplishment of the goals and objectives of the department’s programs, including providing vocational rehabilitation and independent living services to, among others, individuals with the most significant
 disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19001.

There is in the California Health and Human Services Agency the Department of Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 102.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19002.

The Department of Rehabilitation is under the control of an officer known as the Director of Rehabilitation. As used in this division “department” and “director” refer to the Department of Rehabilitation and the Director of Rehabilitation, respectively, unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19003.

The director is appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and holds office at the pleasure of the Governor. The annual salary of the director is provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Upon recommendation of the director, the Governor may appoint a chief deputy director of the department who shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The salary of the chief deputy director shall be fixed in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

19004.

The provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code apply to the director and the director is the head of a department within the meaning of the chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19005.

The department is vested with all necessary powers and authority to cooperate with the government of the United States or any agency or agencies thereof in the administration of any act of Congress and rules and regulations lawfully adopted thereunder relating to individuals with disabilities or their vocational rehabilitation and independent living.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 3.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19005.1.

The Department of Rehabilitation is hereby designated as the sole state agency with full power to supervise every phase of the administration of the state plan for vocational rehabilitation services. All decisions affecting eligibility for and the nature and scope of vocational rehabilitation services to be provided will be made by the department through its organizational units.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 171.)
-------------------------------------------

19005.5.

(a) The Department of Rehabilitation shall establish a program authorizing rehabilitation professionals serving industrially injured workers under the provisions of Labor Code Section 139.5 to refer clients to the Department of Rehabilitation for federal targeted jobs tax credit eligibility determination. The Department shall set forth the specific requirements, procedures, and eligibility criteria. The Department shall not be required to certify, for purposes of the federal targeted jobs tax credit, industrially injured workers who do not meet the eligibility requirements set forth in the federal Rehabilitation Act. 

(b) The Department shall be authorized to collect a fee from the insurer or self-insured employer in the amount necessary to determine eligibility and to certify the industrially injured worker for this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1266, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19006.

The department may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, such rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary to enable it to carry out its duties and powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19007.

The director may, with the approval of the Director of Finance, accept on behalf of, and in the name of, the state such gifts, donations, bequests, and devises as may be made to the department or to any school or other institution administered by the director or the department which in his judgment would be of benefit to the state and, if made to a school or other institution, would be of benefit to the school or other institution. Gifts, donations, bequests, and devises may be made subject to such conditions or restrictions as the director may deem advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.

To the extent resources are available, the department may utilize funds from appropriations by Congress, by gifts, grants, or reimbursements from private or public sources or by state appropriations, or both, or by transfer of funds from other state departments subject to usual budgetary controls for the purpose of establishing and operating rehabilitation programs, including an orientation center for the blind, or of providing vocational rehabilitation or independent living services including related administrative costs, or of cooperating with other public or private agencies for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 4.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.5.

(a) The department is authorized to solicit and accept gifts, contributions, and grants from any source, public or private, to establish, implement, and maintain an awards program.

(b) (1) There is hereby established the Public Awards Fund, which is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purpose of this section.

(2) The director may receive contributions pursuant to this section and deposit them in the Public Awards Fund for use pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) Sections 11005 and 16302 of the Government Code shall not apply to funds under
 this section.

(c) In order to achieve the public policy of the State of California, as specified in Section 19000, the director may present awards to those employers, architects, clients, ex-clients, Californians with disabilities nominated or selected for the Hall of Fame, and other persons whose superior cooperation and contributions to the employment of persons with disabilities deserve special recognition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 797, Sec. 7.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19009.

No period of residence in this state is required for participation in any program administered by the department, except as required by federal law or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19009.5.

No person shall have his or her rehabilitation services reduced due to the receipt of any private grants, scholarships, or awards, provided for the purpose of postsecondary education, except insofar as federal law may require service reductions due to these scholarships, grants, or awards when provided by postsecondary institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 282, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19010.

Pursuant to agreements the department shall cooperate with the federal government in carrying out the purposes of any federal statutes pertaining to the purposes of this division and may adopt the methods of administration found necessary by the federal government for the proper and efficient operation of the agreements or plans for vocational rehabilitation and independent living services and may comply with the conditions as may be necessary to secure the full benefits of such federal statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 5.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.

The people of the state accept the provisions and benefits of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 3.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19012.

In accepting the provisions and benefits of the act of Congress referred to in Section 19011, the people of the state agree to observe and comply with all of its requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19013.

(a) (1) The department may cooperate with other departments, agencies, and institutions, both public and private, in providing the services authorized by this division to individuals with disabilities, in studying the problems involved therein, and in establishing, developing, and providing, in conformity with the purposes of this division, such programs, facilities, and services as may be necessary or desirable.

(2) Cooperation may include contracts and cost-sharing agreements, to the extent permitted by the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (P.L. 93-112), as amended, and the implementing federal regulations.

(3) Within the scope of the federal Rehabilitation Act, through cooperative agreements with other public agencies, the department shall maximize the resources of each agency to better mutually serve individuals with disabilities through enhanced services. To provide these services, within the provisions of federal law, the department and other agencies shall share facilities, utilize existing eligibility and assessment information, participate in cross-training for agencies participating in cooperative programs, and engage in other cooperative activities to reduce duplication of services and to provide a new enhanced pattern of services for individuals with disabilities.

(b) The department may cooperate with the State Department of Education and with the state public postsecondary education system to provide instruction, individual counseling and guidance, and related rehabilitation services for eligible students with disabilities.

(c) The department may cooperate with school districts, with public secondary schools, and with the state public postsecondary education system to employ personnel to assist in the vocational orientation of students with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 7.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19013.5.

(a) In performing any rehabilitative services or in contracting with other public or private agencies for rehabilitative services, the department shall take into consideration the needs of non-English-speaking individuals with disabilities and shall provide language assistance to those individuals participating in the department’s public or private rehabilitation programs.

(b) To the extent funds are available, the department also shall take into consideration the needs of individuals with disabilities who rely on alternate modes of communication, such as manual communication, tactile, oral, and nonverbal communication devices, and shall provide communication assistance to those individuals participating in the department’s programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 8.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19014.

The Department of Rehabilitation and the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall formulate a plan of cooperation for the referral and rehabilitation of persons in industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

19015.

The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to provide for the services authorized by this division to residents of the state concerned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19016.

The department may prepare and promulgate regulations and statements of policy governing the protection of records and confidential information, the manner and form of filing applications, eligibility and investigation and determination thereof, for vocational rehabilitation services, procedure for fair hearings and such other regulations and policies as are found necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19017.

The department may conduct research and compile statistics relating to the provision of services or the need of services by individuals with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19018.

Financial need shall be considered in the furnishing or denial of services in accordance with the Federal Vocational Rehabilitation Act and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 10.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19020.

(a) On and after July 1, 1993, the department shall recommend to each organization or agency, the purpose of which is to provide services to individuals who are blind, that receives grants or contracts from the department, the number of blind members of the board that is appropriate to meet the needs of the community being served by that board.

(b) As used in this section, “blind” means the same as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1037, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Program Managers [19050. - 19054.]

19050.

There is in the department a program manager for the blind and visually impaired and a program manager for the deaf and hard of hearing. The program managers shall, as determined by the director, report to the deputy director of the division established pursuant to Section 19095, and shall assist in the development and coordination of policy with respect to programs for persons who are blind and visually impaired and persons who are deaf and hard of hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19050.5.

The program manager for the blind and visually impaired programs and the program manager for the deaf and hard-of-hearing programs shall have demonstrated experience and sensitivity in working with these disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19053.

The provisions of this chapter shall be effective only to the extent permitted under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19054.

The director shall appoint a Deaf Advisory Committee to advise the director on means to increase employment, enlarge economic opportunities, enhance independence and self-sufficiency, and otherwise improve services to persons who are deaf or hard of hearing. A majority of the committee members shall be deaf or hard of hearing, and other members shall have experience relating to services to the deaf or hard of hearing. The committee shall develop, in conjunction with stakeholders, an annual work plan to identify and address areas for improvement in services provided by the department to persons who are deaf or hard of hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund [19075. - 19092.]

19075.

The Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund in the State Treasury is hereby created. All grants of money received by this state from the United States, the expenditure of which is administered under the provisions of Sections 19011 to 19013, inclusive, shall, on order of the State Controller, be deposited in the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19076.

The State Treasurer, as required by the federal act relating to vocational rehabilitation referred to in Section 19012 shall receive and provide for the proper custody of all funds apportioned to the state under that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19077.

The State Treasurer shall also receive and provide for the proper custody of all money appropriated by this chapter (commencing with Section 19075), of all money that may be hereafter appropriated for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, and of all money that may be received by the department under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19078.

Money in the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund shall be expended as provided by this chapter, as requisitioned by the department in carrying out the provisions of this code and the federal act relating to vocational rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19079.

All money in the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund is hereby appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure for the purposes for which the money deposited therein is made available by the United States for expenditure by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19080.

The State Controller may approve any general plan whereby:

(a) Any expenditures which are a proper charge against money made available by the United States and deposited in the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund may be paid in the first instance from any appropriation from the General Fund, expenditures from which are administered under the provisions of Sections 19010 to 19012, inclusive; and

(b) The General Fund shall be reimbursed for expenditures made therefrom that are a proper charge against the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund.

Such a general plan may provide for advance transfers from the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund to the General Fund, based on estimates of such expenditures that will be subject to reimbursement from the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund pursuant to such plan, and may provide for reimbursements to the Vocational Rehabilitation Federal Fund, when necessary.

Requests for reimbursement or transfer pursuant to such a plan shall be furnished to the State Controller in writing by the department, accompanied by such financial statements as the plan may provide. On order of the State Controller, the required amount shall be transferred in accordance therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

19090.

(a) Pursuant to federal law, there is a State Rehabilitation Council, that shall advise and assist the director in carrying out the vocational rehabilitation provisions of this division.

(b) The membership of the council shall be appointed by the Governor and shall be composed of the representatives specified in Section 725 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 193, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19091.

(a) Pursuant to federal law, there is a State Independent Living Council, that shall advise and assist the director in carrying out the independent living provisions of this division and federal law.

(b) The membership of the council shall be appointed by the Governor and shall be composed of the representatives specified in Section 796d of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 147, Sec. 44.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19092.

(a) The functions of the State Rehabilitation Council and the State Independent Living Council and terms of appointment of the members thereof shall be governed by Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 701) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(b) Members of the councils described in subdivision (a) shall be reimbursed for the actual costs of reasonable and necessary expenses, including child care and personal assistance services, incurred when attending council meetings and or performing council duties. In addition, any member who is unemployed or who is required to forfeit wages from other employment shall be compensated one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day the member is engaged in attending council meetings and or performing duties of the council.

(c) The director, in consultation with the councils, shall provide necessary staff support and assistance for the respective councils to carry out their functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 193, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired and the Deaf and Hard of Hearing [19095. - 19098.5.]

19095.

(a) (1) There is hereby established in the Department of Rehabilitation a Division of Specialized Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired and the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.

(2) For purposes of this chapter “division” means the division established pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The purposes of the division shall be as follows:

(1) To assist persons who are blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard of hearing in gaining competitive employment.

(2) To enlarge economic opportunities for persons who are blind or visually impaired and deaf and hard of hearing.

(3) To enhance the independence and self-sufficiency of blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19095.5.

(a) The division shall be under the direction of a deputy director, who shall be appointed by the Governor.

(b) The deputy director shall have extensive background in, or knowledge of, services to the blind and visually impaired and the deaf and hard of hearing.

(c) The deputy director shall report directly to the directorate of the Department of Rehabilitation and shall be a member of the department’s executive management, taking part in all departmental planning and decisionmaking.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19096.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2003, the division shall be charged with the administration of the following programs and services:

(1) All staff within the division, including rehabilitation counselors, rehabilitation counselors for the blind, staff of the orientation center, and staff of the business enterprises program.

(2) Orientation centers for the blind, provided for pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 19500) of Chapter 6 of Part 2.

(3) The Business Enterprise Program for the Blind, provided pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 19625) of Chapter 6 of Part 2.

(4) Contracts for services with organizations serving the blind and visually impaired and the deaf and hard of hearing.

(5) Programs for the blind under Subchapter 7 (commencing with Section 796) of Chapter 16 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(b) The division shall also provide additional rehabilitation services to its blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing clients, to the extent that funds are available.

(c) The program managers shall report to the deputy director of the division established pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The division shall be responsible for administrative functions, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Develop, implement, and oversee policies related to blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing consumers, including timely provision of assistive technology services.

(2) Develop and implement mandatory orientation training programs for new rehabilitation counselors for the blind, rehabilitation counselors for the deaf, and counselor teachers.

(3) Develop and implement ongoing mandatory training for rehabilitation supervisors of blind-designated units.

(4) Establish minimum professional competencies for rehabilitation counselors for the blind, rehabilitation counselors for the deaf, and counselor teachers, and provide continuing in-service education to rehabilitation counselors for the blind, rehabilitation counselors for the deaf, and counselor teachers.

(5) Provide support and assistance to field staff on issues related to the cases of blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing consumers.

(6) Provide technical assistance to the department related to the assistive technology needs of blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing employees and consumers.

(7) Establish and maintain within the department’s Internet Web site, a communications system for staff serving blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing consumers for the purpose of sharing resource information, effective practices, and problem solving.

(e) Any program administered in whole or in part by the State Department of Education relative to the transition from school to work for blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard-of-hearing secondary education students shall be conducted in partnership with the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19097.

(a) Subject to the control of the director, all employees of the department providing services to persons who are blind and visually impaired administered by the division pursuant to this chapter shall be under the exclusive direction and supervision of the deputy director of the division.

(b) The division shall establish criteria and train counselors and supervisors working with persons who are blind and visually impaired and deaf and hard of hearing to ensure they have the specialized knowledge and skills to meet the needs of these persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19097.5.

The department shall report annually in the fourth quarter of each calendar year to the Blind Advisory Committee on the amount of state and federal funds allocated to direct services governed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19098.

The Director of Rehabilitation shall, on or before July 1, 2005, and every other year thereafter, report to the Legislature and the Governor on the programs administered by the division. The report shall include statistics on competitive employment placements of persons who are blind or visually impaired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19098.5.

The Director of Rehabilitation shall establish the Blind Advisory Committee to advise the Director of Rehabilitation on means to increase competitive employment, enlarge economic opportunities, enhance independence and self-sufficiency, and otherwise improve services for persons who are blind and visually impaired. A majority of the members shall be blind or visually impaired. Members of the committee who are not blind or visually impaired shall have experience in services to the blind. The committee shall develop, in conjunction with stakeholders, an annual work plan to identify and address areas for improvement in services provided by the division to persons who are blind and visually impaired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. REHABILITATION SERVICES, PROGRAMS, AND FACILITIES [19100. - 19806.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [19100. - 19104.5.]

19100.

(a) The department shall provide the services defined and authorized by this part to individuals with physical or mental disabilities who are found to be eligible therefor. 

(b) To the maximum extent appropriate, and consistent with federal law, existing information available from other programs and providers, particularly information used by education officials and the United States Social Security Administration, and information that can be provided by the individual with a disability or the family of the individual, may be used for purposes of determining eligibility for vocational rehabilitation services and for choosing rehabilitation goals, objectives, and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 14.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19101.

Pursuant to federal law, the department may conduct an evaluation, when necessary, including, but not limited to, diagnostic and related services, necessary to determine eligibility for vocational rehabilitation services and for choosing rehabilitation goals, objectives, and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 14.5.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19102.

Pursuant to federal law, the department shall establish a priority order to be followed in selecting individuals to whom vocational rehabilitation services will be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 15.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19103.

(a) Any individual with a disability, as defined in Section 19151, who requires vocational rehabilitation services to prepare for, enter, engage in, or retain gainful employment, is eligible for services under this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of Section 19151, it shall be presumed that an individual can benefit in terms of an employment outcome from vocational rehabilitation services unless it can be demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that the individual is incapable of doing so.

(c) Eligibility determinations for vocational rehabilitation services shall be completed within the timeframes specified in federal law and, to the extent possible, shall rely upon the information specified in Section 19100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 16.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.

(a) Subject to the limitation of Section 19102 and to the extent federal funds are available, an individualized plan for employment shall be developed for each individual determined to be eligible under this chapter.

(b) The individualized plan for employment shall do all of the
 following:

(1) Be designed to achieve the employment objective of the individual, consistent with the unique strengths, resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, and capabilities of the individual, and, to the maximum extent appropriate, to include placement in integrated settings.

(2) Be jointly developed and agreed upon by the eligible individual, or when appropriate the individual’s parent, family member, guardian, advocate, or authorized representative, and the department. In developing the program, the department shall inform the individual about and involve the individual in choosing among alternative goals, objectives, available services, entities providing the services, and the methods used to provide or procure the services.

(3) Contain all of the information required by federal law and regulations,
 including a statement of the specific vocational goods and services, as defined in Section 19150, to be provided and the terms and conditions under which available goods and services will be provided, to the extent federal funds are available, to the individual in the most integrated setting.

(4) To the extent possible, utilize the information specified in Section 19100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 4.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.5.

(a) For the purpose of ensuring, consistent with federal law, that eligible individuals are given meaningful, informed, and increased choices in the rehabilitation process, identification of all of the following shall occur for each eligible individual with the full participation of that individual:

(1) Possible alternative employment goals and outcomes that are consistent with the unique strengths, resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, and capabilities of the individual.

(2) The service options that are available to achieve the employment goals and outcomes selected by the individual.

(3) For each service selected by the individual, the entities available to provide those services.

(b) Choices made by the eligible individual in accordance with subdivision (a) shall be incorporated into the individualized plan for employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 5.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [19150. - 19154.]

19150.

(a) The term “vocational rehabilitation services” means the following services and goods:

(1) An assessment for determining eligibility and vocational rehabilitation needs by qualified personnel, including if appropriate, an assessment by personnel skilled in rehabilitation technology or an assessment for supported employment as an employment outcome.

(2) Counseling, guidance, and work-related placement services for persons with disabilities, including job search assistance, placement assistance, job retention services, personal assistance services, followup services, and specific postemployment services necessary to
 assist those individuals in maintaining, regaining, or advancing in their employment, both competitive and supported.

(3) Training services for persons with disabilities, which shall include personal and vocational adjustment, books, and other training materials.

(4) Auxiliary aide services, such as reader services for individuals who are blind and interpreter services for individuals who are deaf.

(5) Job coaching services that may include any of the following:

(A) On-the-job skill training.

(B) Observation or supervision at the worksite.

(C) Consultation or training, or both, of coworkers and supervisors.

(D) Assistance in integrating into the work environment.

(E) Destination training.

(F) Assistance with public support agencies.

(G) Family and residential provider consultation.

(H) Any other on- or off-the-job support services needed to reinforce and stabilize job placement.

(6) Recruitment and training services for persons with disabilities to provide them with new employment opportunities in the fields of rehabilitation, health, welfare, public safety, and law
 enforcement, and other appropriate service employment.

(7) Physical and mental restoration services, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Corrective surgery or therapeutic treatment necessary to correct or substantially modify a physical or mental condition which is stable or slowly progressive and constitutes an impediment to employment, but is of such a nature that the correction or modification may reasonably be expected to eliminate or substantially reduce the impediment to employment within a reasonable length of time.

(B) Necessary hospitalization in connection with surgery or treatment.

(C) Prosthetic and orthotic devices.

(D) Eyeglasses and visual services as prescribed by a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye or by an optometrist.

(8) Maintenance, not exceeding the additional costs incurred while participating in rehabilitation.

(9) Occupational licenses, tools, equipment, and initial stocks and supplies.

(10) Rehabilitation technology services, which shall include rehabilitation engineering and assistive technology services and devices.

(11) On-the-job or other related personal assistance services provided to an individual with a disability who is receiving other vocational rehabilitation services.

(12) Transition services to students, pursuant to cooperative agreements established under Section 19013, that promote or facilitate the accomplishment of long-term rehabilitation goals and intermediate rehabilitation objectives.

(13) Referral and other services designed to assist individuals with disabilities in securing needed services from other agencies through agreements developed pursuant to Section 19013.

(14) The provision of other programs and services when provided for the benefit of groups of individuals, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) In the case of any type of small business operated by individuals with significant
 disabilities, the operation of which can be improved by management services and supervision provided by the department, the provision of those services and supervision, alone or together with the acquisition by the department of vending stands and other equipment and initial stocks and supplies.

(B) The establishment, development, or improvement of community rehabilitation programs that promise to contribute substantially to the rehabilitation of a group of individuals but that are not related directly to the rehabilitation plan of any one individual with a disability, providing the program is used to provide services that promote integration and competitive employment, including supported employment.

(C) Technical assistance and support services to businesses that are not
 subject to Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 12111) of Chapter 126 of Title 42 of the United States Code and that are seeking to employ individuals with disabilities.

(15) Transportation in connection with the rendering of any other vocational rehabilitation service.

(16) Any other goods and services necessary to render a person with disabilities employable.

(17) Services to the families of persons with disabilities when those services will contribute substantially to the rehabilitation of those individuals.

(18) Services to formerly incarcerated persons with disabilities, designed to promote rehabilitation and reduce the likelihood of recidivism.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), full consideration of eligibility for any comparable service or benefit shall be utilized to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 167, Sec. 2.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19151.

(a) The term “individual with a disability” means any individual who:

(1) Has a physical or mental impairment which constitutes or results in a substantial impediment to employment.

(2) Can benefit in terms of an employment outcome from vocational rehabilitation services provided pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The term “individual with a
 significant
 disability” shall have the same meaning as specified in the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, and includes, but is not limited to, any individual who has a disability or is blind as determined pursuant to Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 401) and Subchapter XVI (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.
